District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.32

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Office of First Source Compliance.

(2)

“Office” means the Office of First Source Compliance.

(3)

“First Source Employment Agreement” means the requirements of part A of this subchapter [§ 2-219.01 et seq.].

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1019, 55 DCR 7598